Washington statutes.
RCW 36.79.070

Board may contract with department of transportation for staff services and facilities.

The board may contract with the department of transportation to furnish any necessary staff services and facilities required in the administration of the rural arterial program. The cost of such services that are attributable to the rural arterial program, together with travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 of the members and all other lawful expenses of the board that are attributable to the rural arterial program, shall be paid from the rural arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund.

[ 1983 1st ex.s. c 49 s 7.]